Hawaii statutes.
§92-6 Judicial branch, quasi-judicial
boards and investigatory functions; applicability. (a) This part shall
not apply:

(1) To the judicial branch.

(2) To adjudicatory functions exercised by a board
and governed by sections 91-8 and 91-9, or authorized by other sections of the
Hawaii Revised Statutes. In the application of this subsection, boards
exercising adjudicatory functions include, but are not limited to, the
following:

(A) Hawaii labor relations board, chapters 89
and 377;

(B) Labor and industrial relations appeals
board, chapter 371;

(C) Hawaii paroling authority, chapter 353;

(D) Civil service commission, chapter 26;

(E) Board of trustees, employees' retirement
system of the State of Hawaii, chapter 88;

(F) Crime victim compensation commission,
chapter 351; and

(G) State ethics commission, chapter 84.

(b) Notwithstanding provisions in this section
to the contrary, this part shall apply to require open deliberation of the
adjudicatory functions of the land use commission. [L 1975, c 166, pt of §1; am
L 1976, c 92, §8; am L 1985, c 251, §11; am L 1998, c 240, §6]

Cross References

Civil service commission, see definition of "merit
appeals board" in §76-11.
See also §26-5.

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(12).

Case Notes

County planning commission's closed deliberations permissible
under this section despite open meeting mandate of section 92-3. 64 H. 431,
643 P.2d 55.

Adjudicatory functions include adoption of conclusions of
law. 4 H. App. 633, 675 P.2d 784.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next